Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.050

Notice of arbitration.

A party may initiate arbitration by giving notice to arbitrate to the other party in the manner specified in the arbitration agreement or, in the absence of a specified manner, under the law and procedural rules of this state other than this chapter governing contractual arbitration.

[ 2023 c 61 s 6.]